Nebraska, session 109, LB621.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB621 LB621
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-7611, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-7611 (1) The Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund is created. The State
Treasurer shall transfer (a) sixty million three hundred thousand dollars
on or before July 15, 2014, (b) sixty million three hundred fifty
thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2015, (c) sixty million three
hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2016, (d) sixty
million seven hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2017, (e)
five hundred thousand dollars on or before May 15, 2018, (f) sixty-one
million six hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2018, (g)
sixty-two million dollars on or before July 15, 2019, (h) sixty-one
million four hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2020,
(i) sixty-six million two hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15,
2022, (j) fifty-six million seven hundred thousand dollars on or before
July 15, 2023, (k) fifty-four million dollars on or before July 15, 2024,
and (l) sixty-one million six hundred fifty-four million one hundred
fifty thousand dollars on or before every July 15, 2025, and July 15,
2026, and (m) fifty-four million one hundred fifty thousand dollars on or
before July 15 of every year thereafter from the Nebraska Medicaid
Intergovernmental Trust Fund and the Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust
Fund to the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, except that such amount shall
be reduced by the amount of the unobligated balance in the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund at the time the transfer is made. The state
investment officer shall advise the State Treasurer on the amounts to be
transferred first from the Nebraska Medicaid Intergovernmental Trust Fund
until the fund balance is depleted and from the Nebraska Tobacco
Settlement Trust Fund thereafter in order to sustain such transfers in
perpetuity. The state investment officer shall report electronically to
the Legislature on or before October 1 of every even-numbered year on the
sustainability of such transfers. The Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund
shall also include money received pursuant to section 77-2602. Except as
-2-

LB621 LB621
2025 2025
otherwise provided by law, no more than the amounts specified in this
subsection may be appropriated or transferred from the Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund in any fiscal year.
The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Nebraska Medicaid Intergovernmental Trust Fund to the General Fund on
June 28, 2018, and June 28, 2019.
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this
section, it is the intent of the Legislature that no additional programs
are funded through the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund until funding for
all programs with an appropriation from the fund during FY2012-13 are
restored to their FY2012-13 levels.
(2) Any money in the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(3) The University of Nebraska and postsecondary educational
institutions having colleges of medicine in Nebraska and their affiliated
research hospitals in Nebraska, as a condition of receiving any funds
appropriated or transferred from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund,
shall not discriminate against any person on the basis of sexual
orientation.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost of the staff
and operating costs necessary to carry out the changes made by Laws 2018,
LB439, and not covered by fees or federal funds shall be funded from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for fiscal years 2018-19 and 2019-20.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to fund the grants to be
awarded pursuant to section 75-1101 with the Nebraska Health Care Cash
Fund for FY2019-20 and FY2020-21.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2022, but before
June 30, 2023, to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for
-3-

LB621 LB621
2025 2025
the University of Nebraska Medical Center for pancreatic cancer research
at the University of Nebraska Medical Center. Transfers from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund in this subsection shall be contingent upon receipt
of any matching funds from private or other sources, up to fifteen
million dollars, certified by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services. Upon receipt of
any matching funds certified by the budget administrator, the State
Treasurer shall transfer an equal amount of funds to the Board of Regents
of the University of Nebraska.
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature that an increase of seven
million five hundred thousand dollars in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal
year 2026-27 from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund be transferred to
the Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 502, for aid to
the Charles Drew Health Center, OneWorld Community Health Centers, East
Central District Health Department – Good Neighbor Community Health
Center, Community Action Partnership of Western Nebraska, Nebraska
Medicine Midtown Health Center, Bluestem Health, and Heartland Health
Center to fund expanded health care access through community health
centers, including but not limited to, expanding existing lines of
service such as behavioral health or dental services, adding new lines of
service and locations, purchasing equipment, or completing capital
projects. Each center shall receive seven hundred thousand dollars, with
the remaining funds to be distributed proportionately based on the
previous fiscal year's number of uninsured patients as reported by the
Uniform Data System published by the United States Department of Health
and Health Services Bureau of Primary Health Care.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-7611, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-